Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202526-115
Domestic abuse protection order; notice regarding firearm or ammunition.

Upon issuance of any domestic abuse protection order, the court shall cause the notice created under section 29-2291 to be served upon the respondent notifying the respondent that it may be unlawful under federal law for a person who is subject to a domestic abuse protection order to possess or receive any firearm or ammunition.

Laws 2025, LB80, § 15.